src/fst/affixes/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON ac
+A+Pos+Utr+Sg+Indef: # ;
+A+Pos+Neu+Sg+Indef: # ;
adjobl ;

LEXICON av
+A+Pos+Utr+Sg+Indef: # ;
+A+Pos+Neu+Sg+Indef:%>tt # ;
adjobl ;

LEXICON a1
+A+Pos+Utr+Sg+Indef: # ;
+A+Pos+Neu+Sg+Indef:%>tt # ;
adjobl ;

LEXICON adjobl
+A+Pos+Utr+Sg+Def:%>a # ;
+A+Pos+Utr+Pl+Indef:%>a # ;
+A+Pos+Utr+Pl+Def:%>a # ;
+A+Pos+Neu+Sg+Indef:%>t # ;
+A+Pos+Neu+Sg+Def:%>a # ;
+A+Pos+Neu+Pl+Indef:%>a # ;
+A+Pos+Neu+Pl+Def:%>a # ;

+A+Comp:%>are # ;
+A+Superl+Indef:%>ast # ;
+A+Superl+Def:%>aste # ;
